Hawaii statutes.
§205-3 Retention of district boundaries.
Land use district boundaries existing as of June 2, 1975, shall continue
in full force and effect subject to amendment as provided in this chapter or
order of a court of competent jurisdiction based upon any litigation filed
prior to July 1, 1975, or filed within thirty days after service of a
certified copy of any final decision and order made as part of the commission's
1974 periodic boundary review, whichever occurs later. [L 1963, c 205, pt of
§2; Supp, §98H-3; am L 1975, c 193, §4; HRS §205-3]

Revision Note

"June 2,
1975" substituted for "the effective date of this Act".

Attorney General Opinions

Statute contemplates
and authorizes changes in classification as originally proposed and as finally
adopted, and to require new notice and hearing whenever there is any change is
too burdensome. Att. Gen. Op. 71‑2.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next